Nevada, session 83, SB337.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 449 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A medical facility or facility which is required by the
regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be
licensed that administers opioids to patients shall:
(a) Comply with the requirements of sections 8 to 23, inclusive,
of this act and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto; and
-
*SB337_R1*

– 4 –
(b) Offer to a patient an alternative treatment that does not
utilize an opioid before administering an opioid to the patient for
the first time unless:
(1) In the opinion of the attending provider of health care,
there is no treatment that does not utilize an opioid that is suitable
for treating the patient; or
(2) It is not practicable to offer such an alternative
treatment to the patient.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 1 and section
19 of this act, if a patient or his or her legal guardian has executed
a non-opioid directive or states that the patient wishes to receive
an alternative treatment that does not utilize an opioid, the
medical facility or facility which is required by the regulations
adopted by the Board pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be licensed
shall provide such a treatment.
3. During each even-numbered year, the Division shall
review compliance with the requirements of this section by each
medical facility or facility which is required by the regulations
adopted by the Board pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be licensed
that administers opioids to patients.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Non-opioid directive” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 9 of this act.
(b) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 2. NRS 449.029 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.029 As used in NRS 449.029 to 449.240, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, “medical
facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 449.0151 and
includes a program of hospice care described in NRS 449.196.
Sec. 3. NRS 449.0301 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.0301 The provisions of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428,
inclusive, and section 1 of this act do not apply to:
1. Any facility conducted by and for the adherents of any
church or religious denomination for the purpose of providing
facilities for the care and treatment of the sick who depend solely
upon spiritual means through prayer for healing in the practice of
the religion of the church or denomination, except that such a
facility shall comply with all regulations relative to sanitation and
safety applicable to other facilities of a similar category.
2. Foster homes as defined in NRS 424.014.
3. Any medical facility, facility for the dependent or facility
which is otherwise required by the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be licensed that is operated and
maintained by the United States Government or an agency thereof.
-
*SB337_R1*

– 5 –
Sec. 4. NRS 449.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.160 1. The Division may deny an application for a
license or may suspend or revoke any license issued under the
provisions of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and section 1 of
this act upon any of the following grounds:
(a) Violation by the applicant or the licensee of any of the
provisions of NRS 439B.410, 449.029 to 449.245, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act or 449A.100 to 449A.124, inclusive, and
449A.270 to 449A.286, inclusive, or of any other law of this State
or of the standards, rules and regulations adopted thereunder.
(b) Aiding, abetting or permitting the commission of any illegal
act.
(c) Conduct inimical to the public health, morals, welfare and
safety of the people of the State of Nevada in the maintenance and
operation of the premises for which a license is issued.
(d) Conduct or practice detrimental to the health or safety of the
occupants or employees of the facility.
(e) Failure of the applicant to obtain written approval from the
Director of the Department of Health and Human Services as
required by NRS 439A.100 or 439A.102 or as provided in any
regulation adopted pursuant to NRS 449.001 to 449.430, inclusive,
and section 1 of this act and 449.435 to 449.531, inclusive, and
chapter 449A of NRS if such approval is required, including,
without limitation, the closure or conversion of any hospital in a
county whose population is 100,000 or more that is owned by the
licensee without approval pursuant to NRS 439A.102.
(f) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 441A.315 and
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto or NRS 449.2486.
(g) Violation of the provisions of NRS 458.112.
(h) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 449A.170 to
449A.192, inclusive, and any regulation adopted pursuant thereto.
(i) Violation of the provisions of NRS 629.260.
2. In addition to the provisions of subsection 1, the Division
may revoke a license to operate a facility for the dependent if, with
respect to that facility, the licensee that operates the facility, or an
agent or employee of the licensee:
(a) Is convicted of violating any of the provisions of
NRS 202.470;
(b) Is ordered to but fails to abate a nuisance pursuant to NRS
244.360, 244.3603 or 268.4124; or
(c) Is ordered by the appropriate governmental agency to correct
a violation of a building, safety or health code or regulation but fails
to correct the violation.
3. The Division shall maintain a log of any complaints that it
receives relating to activities for which the Division may revoke the
-
*SB337_R1*

– 6 –
license to operate a facility for the dependent pursuant to subsection
2. The Division shall provide to a facility for the care of adults
during the day:
(a) A summary of a complaint against the facility if the
investigation of the complaint by the Division either substantiates
the complaint or is inconclusive;
(b) A report of any investigation conducted with respect to the
complaint; and
(c) A report of any disciplinary action taken against the facility.
 The facility shall make the information available to the public
pursuant to NRS 449.2486.
4. On or before February 1 of each odd-numbered year, the
Division shall submit to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau a written report setting forth, for the previous biennium:
(a) Any complaints included in the log maintained by the
Division pursuant to subsection 3; and
(b) Any disciplinary actions taken by the Division pursuant to
subsection 2.
Sec. 5. NRS 449.163 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.163 1. In addition to the payment of the amount required
by NRS 449.0308, if a medical facility, facility for the dependent or
facility which is required by the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be licensed violates any provision
related to its licensure, including any provision of NRS 439B.410 or
449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and section 1 of this act or any
condition, standard or regulation adopted by the Board, the
Division, in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to
NRS 449.165, may:
(a) Prohibit the facility from admitting any patient until it
determines that the facility has corrected the violation;
(b) Limit the occupancy of the facility to the number of beds
occupied when the violation occurred, until it determines that the
facility has corrected the violation;
(c) If the license of the facility limits the occupancy of the
facility and the facility has exceeded the approved occupancy,
require the facility, at its own expense, to move patients to another
facility that is licensed;
(d) Except where a greater penalty is authorized by subsection 2,
impose an administrative penalty of not more than $5,000 per day
for each violation, together with interest thereon at a rate not to
exceed 10 percent per annum; and
(e) Appoint temporary management to oversee the operation of
the facility and to ensure the health and safety of the patients of the
facility, until:
-
*SB337_R1*

– 7 –
(1) It determines that the facility has corrected the violation
and has management which is capable of ensuring continued
compliance with the applicable statutes, conditions, standards and
regulations; or
(2) Improvements are made to correct the violation.
2. If an off-campus location of a hospital fails to obtain a
national provider identifier that is distinct from the national provider
identifier used by the main campus and any other off-campus
location of the hospital in violation of NRS 449.1818, the Division
may impose against the hospital an administrative penalty of not
more than $10,000 for each day of such failure, together with
interest thereon at a rate not to exceed 10 percent per annum, in
addition to any other action authorized by this chapter.
3. If the facility fails to pay any administrative penalty imposed
pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1 or subsection 2, the
Division may:
(a) Suspend the license of the facility until the administrative
penalty is paid; and
(b) Collect court costs, reasonable attorney’s fees and other
costs incurred to collect the administrative penalty.
4. The Division may require any facility that violates any
provision of NRS 439B.410 or 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, or any condition, standard or regulation
adopted by the Board to make any improvements necessary to
correct the violation.
5. Any money collected as administrative penalties pursuant to
paragraph (d) of subsection 1 or subsection 2 must be accounted for
separately and used to administer and carry out the provisions of
NRS 449.001 to 449.430, inclusive, and section 1 of this act,
449.435 to 449.531, inclusive, and chapter 449A of NRS to protect
the health, safety, well-being and property of the patients and
residents of facilities in accordance with applicable state and federal
standards or for any other purpose authorized by the Legislature.
Sec. 6. NRS 449.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.240 The district attorney of the county in which the facility
is located shall, upon application by the Division, institute and
conduct the prosecution of any action for violation of any provisions
of NRS 449.029 to 449.245, inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act.
Sec. 7. Chapter 449A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 8 to 23, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 8. As used in sections 8 to 23, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 9 to 14, inclusive, of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
-
*SB337_R1*

– 8 –
Sec. 9. “Non-opioid directive” means the form created
pursuant to section 15 of this act.
Sec. 10. “Non-opioid patient” means a person who executes
a non-opioid directive or whose legal guardian has executed a
non-opioid directive on behalf of the person.
Sec. 11. “Practitioner” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 639.0125.
Sec. 12. “Practitioner licensing board” means a licensing
board created by chapter 630, 631, 632, 633, 635 or 636 of NRS.
Sec. 13. “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 14. “Third party” means any insurer, governmental
entity or other organization providing health coverage or benefits
in accordance with state or federal law.
Sec. 15. 1. The Division shall create a form for executing a
non-opioid directive.
2. The form created pursuant to subsection 1 must include,
without limitation:
(a) A statement of circumstances prescribed by section 19 of
this act under which an opioid may be administered to a non-
opioid patient;
(b) A statement of the legal effect of the non-opioid directive,
as prescribed by section 19 of this act;
(c) A place for a person to execute the form in accordance with
section 17 of this act;
(d) A summary of the procedures for revoking a non-opioid
directive pursuant to section 18 of this act; and
(e) Any additional information the Division considers relevant.
3. The Division shall post the form for executing a non-
opioid directive on an Internet website maintained by the Division.
Sec. 16. 1. Except in an emergency situation, before
prescribing, administering or directing or supervising the
administration of an opioid to a patient, a practitioner shall:
(a) Check the medical record of the patient to determine
whether the patient is a non-opioid patient;
(b) If the patient is not a non-opioid patient, explain to the
patient or his or her legal guardian that he or she may execute a
non-opioid directive in accordance with section 17 of this act; and
(c) If the patient or legal guardian indicates that he or she
would like to execute a non-opioid directive, provide the non-
opioid directive to the patient or legal guardian, as applicable, for
execution pursuant to section 17 of this act.
2. A third party that provides health coverage in this State
shall:
-
*SB337_R1*

– 9 –
(a) Post the form for executing a non-opioid directive on an
Internet website maintained by the third party; and
(b) Provide the non-opioid directive to each person who enrolls
in health coverage provided by the third party.
3. A medical facility or facility which is required by the
regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be
licensed that administers opioids to patients shall:
(a) Ensure that persons described in subsection 1 who provide
care at the facility comply with the requirements of that
subsection; and
(b) Post the non-opioid directive on an Internet website
maintained by the facility, if the facility maintains an Internet
website.
Sec. 17. 1. A non-opioid directive may be executed by:
(a) A person for himself or herself; or
(b) The legal guardian of a person on behalf of the person.
2. An executed non-opioid directive becomes effective when a
person described in subsection 1 provides the executed non-opioid
directive to:
(a) A provider of health care, medical facility, facility for the
dependent or facility which is required by the regulations adopted
by the Board pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be licensed that is
providing care to the non-opioid patient to whom the non-opioid
directive pertains; or
(b) A third party that provides coverage to the non-opioid
patient to whom the non-opioid directive pertains.
3. Upon receiving an executed non-opioid directive pursuant
to subsection 2, a provider of health care, a medical facility,
facility for the dependent or facility which is required by the
regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be
licensed or third party shall record the non-opioid directive in the
record of the non-opioid patient to whom the non-opioid directive
pertains.
Sec. 18. 1. A non-opioid patient may revoke his or her non-
opioid directive at any time and in any manner that communicates
to a person or entity described in subsection 2 of section 17 of this
act the intent to revoke the directive.
2. A legal guardian who has executed a non-opioid directive
may revoke the directive at any time by articulating in writing an
intent to revoke the directive and providing such written notice to
a person or entity described in subsection 2 of section 17 of this
act.
3. The revocation of a non-opioid directive is effective upon
the patient or legal guardian communicating pursuant to
-
*SB337_R1*

– 10 –
subsection 1 or 2, the desire to revoke the form. The person or
entity to whom the revocation is communicated shall:
(a) Make the revocation a part of the records of the patient; or
(b) Cause the revocation to be made a part of the record of the
patient.
Sec. 19. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a
person who knows or should know that a person is a non-opioid
patient shall not prescribe, administer or direct or supervise
another in administering an opioid to a non-opioid patient.
2. A practitioner may prescribe, administer, or direct or
supervise the administration of an opioid to a non-opioid patient,
and a person listed in NRS 453.375 may administer an opioid to a
non-opioid patient under such direction or supervision, if:
(a) Prescribing or administering the opioid is medically
necessary, as determined by the practitioner, to treat the patient in
an emergency situation or while the patient is receiving inpatient
care at a medical facility;
(b) The opioid is prescribed or administered for intraoperative
use; or
(c) The opioid is prescribed or administered pursuant to the
regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to subsection 5 of
section 21 of this act.
3. If a non-opioid patient is prescribed or administered an
opioid pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 2, the practitioner
who prescribes, administers or directs or supervises the
administration of the opioid shall ensure that the non-opioid
patient or his or her legal guardian receives information on
preventing opioid use disorder, including, without limitation,
relapse into opioid use disorder, when the emergency situation has
ended or the person is being discharged from the medical facility.
Sec. 20. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 21. The Board shall adopt regulations as necessary to
carry out the provisions of sections 8 to 23, inclusive, of this act,
including, without limitation, regulations prescribing procedures:
1. For a practitioner to record a non-opioid directive in the
medical record of a non-opioid patient;
2. For a non-opioid patient or the legal guardian of a non-
opioid patient to revoke a non-opioid directive;
3. To ensure that the recording, disclosure and distribution of
a non-opioid directive and data relating to such a directive
complies with applicable state and federal laws and regulations
concerning the confidentiality of health information and informed
consent to health care;
4. For complying with the requirements of section 16 of this
act; and
-
*SB337_R1*

– 11 –
5. For prescribing and administering opioids to a non-opioid
patient:
(a) To treat a substance use disorder; or
(b) If the non-opioid patient is receiving hospice care.
Sec. 22. 1. The Administrator of the Division shall appoint
an advisory board to advise the Division concerning the
implementation of sections 8 to 23, inclusive, of this act and
monitoring compliance with those provisions. The advisory board
must consist of persons selected by the Administrator who have
expertise in the safe and effective use of opioids during the
provision of health care and the treatment of substance use
disorder.
2. The term of office of a member of the advisory board is 3
years and commences on July 1 of the year of appointment. The
terms of office of the members of the advisory board must be
staggered to result in, as nearly as possible, the appointment of an
equal number of members to the advisory board on July 1 of each
year.
3. The members of the advisory board serve without
compensation and are not entitled to the per diem and travel
expenses provided for state officers and employees generally.
4. Each member of the advisory board who is an officer or
employee of this State or a political subdivision of this State must
be relieved from his or her duties without loss of regular
compensation so that the officer or employee may prepare for and
attend meetings of the advisory board and perform any work
necessary to carry out the duties of the advisory board in the most
timely manner practicable. A state agency or political subdivision
of this State shall not require an officer or employee who is a
member of the advisory board to make up the time the officer or
employee is absent from work to carry out duties as a member of
the advisory board or use annual leave or compensatory time for
the absence.
5. The advisory board shall:
(a) Elect a Chair from among its members; and
(b) Meet at the times and places specified by a call of the
Chair.
Sec. 23. The advisory board appointed pursuant to section 22
of this act shall:
1. Review the implementation of and compliance with the
requirements of sections 8 to 23, inclusive, of this act, including,
without limitation, by:
(a) Hearing testimony from:
-
*SB337_R1*

– 12 –
(1) Practitioners, patients, persons who have recovered or
are in recovery from opioid use disorder and persons involved in
the treatment of opioid use disorder;
(2) Representatives of the Division, practitioner licensing
boards and other organizations; and
(3) Other persons and entities with knowledge and
information related to opioids, opioid use disorder or non-opioid
alternatives to opioids or any other relevant knowledge and
information; and
(b) Reviewing proposed and enacted legislation, regulations
and other changes to state and local policy related to non-opioid
directives and the prescribing and use of opioids; and
2. Make recommendations to practitioner licensing boards,
the Department, the Legislature and other governmental entities
concerning issues relating to opioid use and alternative treatments
that do not utilize opioids.
Sec. 24. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 25. Chapter 287 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services finds that a health
facility has failed to comply with section 1 of this act or a
practitioner licensing board finds that a practitioner has failed to
comply with section 33, 35, 36, 37 or 39 of this act or NRS
636.2882, the Board may:
(a) Reduce the reimbursement rates paid to the health facility
or practitioner, as applicable, by the plan of health insurance
provided by the Board; or
(b) Prohibit the health facility or practitioner, as applicable,
from receiving payments through the insurance provided through
the Program.
2. The Board shall include in any contract with a provider of
health care notice of the actions the Board may take pursuant to
subsection 1.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Health facility” means a medical facility, as defined in
NRS 449.0151, or a facility which is required by the regulations
adopted by the State Board of Health pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to
be licensed.
(b) “Practitioner” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 639.0125.
(c) “Practitioner licensing board” means a board created
pursuant to chapter 630, 631, 632, 633, 635 or 636 of NRS.
-
*SB337_R1*

– 13 –
Sec. 26. NRS 287.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.010 1. The governing body of any county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency of the State of
Nevada may:
(a) Adopt and carry into effect a system of group life, accident
or health insurance, or any combination thereof, for the benefit of its
officers and employees, and the dependents of officers and
employees who elect to accept the insurance and who, where
necessary, have authorized the governing body to make deductions
from their compensation for the payment of premiums on the
insurance.
(b) Purchase group policies of life, accident or health insurance,
or any combination thereof, for the benefit of such officers and
employees, and the dependents of such officers and employees, as
have authorized the purchase, from insurance companies authorized
to transact the business of such insurance in the State of Nevada,
and, where necessary, deduct from the compensation of officers and
employees the premiums upon insurance and pay the deductions
upon the premiums.
(c) Provide group life, accident or health coverage through a
self-insurance reserve fund and, where necessary, deduct
contributions to the maintenance of the fund from the compensation
of officers and employees and pay the deductions into the fund. The
money accumulated for this purpose through deductions from the
compensation of officers and employees and contributions of the
governing body must be maintained as an internal service fund as
defined by NRS 354.543. The money must be deposited in a state or
national bank or credit union authorized to transact business in the
State of Nevada. Any independent administrator of a fund created
under this section is subject to the licensing requirements of chapter
683A of NRS, and must be a resident of this State. Any contract
with an independent administrator must be approved by the
Commissioner of Insurance as to the reasonableness of
administrative charges in relation to contributions collected and
benefits provided. The provisions of NRS 439.581 to 439.597,
inclusive, 686A.135, 687B.352, 687B.408, 687B.692, 687B.723,
687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.030 to 689B.0317, inclusive, and
section 45 of this act, paragraphs (b) and (c) of subsection 1 of NRS
689B.0319, subsections 2, 4, 6 and 7 of NRS 689B.0319, 689B.033
to 689B.0369, inclusive, 689B.0375 to 689B.050, inclusive,
689B.0675, 689B.265, 689B.287 and 689B.500 apply to coverage
provided pursuant to this paragraph, except that the provisions of
NRS 689B.0378, 689B.03785 and 689B.500 only apply to coverage
-
*SB337_R1*

– 14 –
for active officers and employees of the governing body, or the
dependents of such officers and employees.
(d) Defray part or all of the cost of maintenance of a self-
insurance fund or of the premiums upon insurance. The money for
contributions must be budgeted for in accordance with the laws
governing the county, school district, municipal corporation,
political subdivision, public corporation or other local governmental
agency of the State of Nevada.
2. If a school district offers group insurance to its officers and
employees pursuant to this section, members of the board of trustees
of the school district must not be excluded from participating in the
group insurance. If the amount of the deductions from compensation
required to pay for the group insurance exceeds the compensation to
which a trustee is entitled, the difference must be paid by the trustee.
3. In any county in which a legal services organization exists,
the governing body of the county, or of any school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of the State of Nevada in the
county, may enter into a contract with the legal services
organization pursuant to which the officers and employees of the
legal services organization, and the dependents of those officers and
employees, are eligible for any life, accident or health insurance
provided pursuant to this section to the officers and employees, and
the dependents of the officers and employees, of the county, school
district, municipal corporation, political subdivision, public
corporation or other local governmental agency.
4. If a contract is entered into pursuant to subsection 3, the
officers and employees of the legal services organization:
(a) Shall be deemed, solely for the purposes of this section, to be
officers and employees of the county, school district, municipal
corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or other local
governmental agency with which the legal services organization has
contracted; and
(b) Must be required by the contract to pay the premiums or
contributions for all insurance which they elect to accept or of which
they authorize the purchase.
5. A contract that is entered into pursuant to subsection 3:
(a) Must be submitted to the Commissioner of Insurance for
approval not less than 30 days before the date on which the contract
is to become effective.
(b) Does not become effective unless approved by the
Commissioner.
(c) Shall be deemed to be approved if not disapproved by the
Commissioner within 30 days after its submission.
-
*SB337_R1*

– 15 –
6. As used in this section, “legal services organization” means
an organization that operates a program for legal aid and receives
money pursuant to NRS 19.031.
Sec. 27. NRS 287.0402 is hereby amended to read as follows:
287.0402 As used in NRS 287.0402 to 287.049, inclusive, and
section 25 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 287.0404 to 287.04064, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 28. NRS 287.04335 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.04335 If the Board provides health insurance through a
plan of self-insurance, it shall comply with the provisions of NRS
439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, 686A.135, 687B.352, 687B.409,
687B.692, 687B.723, 687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.0353, 689B.255,
695C.1723, 695G.150, 695G.155, 695G.160, 695G.162,
695G.1635, 695G.164, 695G.1645, 695G.1665, 695G.167,
695G.1675, 695G.170 to 695G.1712, inclusive, 695G.1714 to
695G.174, inclusive, and section 53 of this act, 695G.176,
695G.177, 695G.200 to 695G.230, inclusive, 695G.241 to
695G.310, inclusive, 695G.405 and 695G.415, in the same manner
as an insurer that is licensed pursuant to title 57 of NRS is required
to comply with those provisions.
Sec. 29. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 30. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 30.3. NRS 422.403 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.403 1. The Department shall, by regulation, establish and
manage the use by the Medicaid program of step therapy and prior
authorization for prescription drugs.
2. The Drug Use Review Board shall:
(a) Advise the Department concerning the use by the Medicaid
program of step therapy and prior authorization for prescription
drugs;
(b) Develop step therapy protocols and prior authorization
policies and procedures for use by the Medicaid program for
prescription drugs; and
(c) Review and approve, based on clinical evidence and best
clinical practice guidelines and without consideration of the cost of
the prescription drugs being considered, step therapy protocols used
by the Medicaid program for prescription drugs.
3. The step therapy protocol established pursuant to this section
must not apply to a drug approved by the Food and Drug
Administration that is prescribed to treat a psychiatric condition of a
recipient of Medicaid, if:
(a) The drug has been approved by the Food and Drug
Administration with indications for the psychiatric condition of the
-
*SB337_R1*

– 16 –
insured or the use of the drug to treat that psychiatric condition is
otherwise supported by medical or scientific evidence;
(b) The drug is prescribed by:
(1) A psychiatrist;
(2) A physician assistant under the supervision of a
psychiatrist;
(3) An advanced practice registered nurse who has the
psychiatric training and experience prescribed by the State Board of
Nursing pursuant to NRS 632.120; or
(4) A primary care provider that is providing care to an
insured in consultation with a practitioner listed in subparagraph (1),
(2) or (3), if the closest practitioner listed in subparagraph (1), (2) or
(3) who participates in Medicaid is located 60 miles or more from
the residence of the recipient; and
(c) The practitioner listed in paragraph (b) who prescribed the
drug knows, based on the medical history of the recipient, or
reasonably expects each alternative drug that is required to be used
earlier in the step therapy protocol to be ineffective at treating the
psychiatric condition.
4. The Department shall not require the Drug Use Review
Board to develop, review or approve prior authorization policies or
procedures necessary for the operation of the list of preferred
prescription drugs developed pursuant to NRS 422.4025.
5. The Department shall accept recommendations from the
Drug Use Review Board as the basis for developing or revising step
therapy protocols and prior authorization policies and procedures
used by the Medicaid program for prescription drugs.
6. The Department shall require the Drug Use Review Board,
for the purpose of ensuring sufficient access by recipients of
Medicaid to alternatives to opioids, to regularly review the step
therapy protocols and prior authorization policies and procedures
applicable to drugs that are approved by the United States Food
and Drug Administration as alternatives to opioids.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical or scientific evidence” has the meaning ascribed to
it in NRS 695G.053.
(b) “Step therapy protocol” means a procedure that requires a
recipient of Medicaid to use a prescription drug or sequence of
prescription drugs other than a drug that a practitioner recommends
for treatment of a psychiatric condition of the recipient before
Medicaid provides coverage for the recommended drug.
Sec. 30.6. NRS 422.405 is hereby amended to read as follows:
422.405 1. The Department shall, by regulation, set forth the
duties of the Board, which must include, without limitation:
-
*SB337_R1*

– 17 –
(a) Identifying the prescription drugs which should be included
on the list of preferred prescription drugs developed by the
Department pursuant to NRS 422.4025, which must include,
without limitation, any prescription drug required by the Centers for
Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States Department of
Health and Human Services to be covered by the Medicaid program
and any other prescription drug deemed essential by the Board;
(b) Identifying the prescription drugs which should be excluded
from any restrictions that are imposed by the Medicaid program on
drugs that are on the list of preferred prescription drugs;
(c) Identifying classes of therapeutic prescription drugs for its
review and performing a clinical analysis of each drug included in
each class that is identified for review; and
(d) Reviewing at least annually all classes of therapeutic
prescription drugs on the list of preferred prescription drugs
developed by the Department pursuant to NRS 422.4025.
2. The Department shall, by regulation, require the Board to:
(a) Base its decisions on evidence of clinical efficacy, safety and
outcomes for patients and, if the difference between the clinical
efficacy, safety and outcomes for two or more drugs is not clinically
significant, cost;
(b) Review new pharmaceutical products in as expeditious a
manner as possible; [and]
(c) Consider new clinical evidence supporting the inclusion of
an existing pharmaceutical product on the list of preferred
prescription drugs developed by the Department and new clinical
evidence supporting the exclusion of an existing pharmaceutical
product from any restrictions that are imposed by the Medicaid
program on drugs that are on the list of preferred prescription drugs
in as expeditious a manner as possible [.] ; and
(d) Review pursuant to paragraph (c) of subsection 1 each new
class of therapeutic prescription drugs that includes a subset of
drugs that are approved by the United States Food and Drug
Administration as alternatives to opioids for purposes for which
opioids would normally be used.
3. The Department shall, by regulation, authorize the Board to:
(a) In carrying out its duties, exercise clinical judgment and
analyze peer review articles, published studies, and other medical
and scientific information; and
(b) Establish subcommittees to analyze specific issues that arise
as the Board carries out its duties.
4. The Board may close any portion of a meeting during which
it considers the cost of prescription drugs.
-
*SB337_R1*

– 18 –
Sec. 31. NRS 433.738 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433.738 1. The statewide plan to allocate money from the
Fund established by the Department, in consultation with the Office,
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 433.734 must:
(a) Establish policies and procedures for the administration and
distribution of money from the Fund;
(b) Allocate the money in the Fund for the purposes described in
[subsection] subsections 2 [;] and 3; and
(c) Establish requirements governing the use of money allocated
from the Fund.
2. The statewide plan must allocate at least 20 percent of the
money distributed from the Fund for projects and grants related to
the prevention of substance use disorders. Such money may be
used for:
(a) The projects described in subparagraph (15) of paragraph
(a) of subsection 3 and, where applicable, other projects described
in that paragraph; and
(b) Grants to an agency or organization listed in paragraph (b)
of subsection 3 for work relating to the prevention of substance
use disorders.
3. The statewide plan may allocate money to:
(a) Statewide projects, which may include, without limitation:
(1) Expanding access to evidence-based prevention of
substance use disorders, early intervention for persons at risk of a
substance use disorder, treatment for substance use disorders and
support for persons in recovery from substance use disorders;
(2) Programs to reduce the incidence and severity of neonatal
abstinence syndrome;
(3) Prevention of adverse childhood experiences and early
intervention for children who have undergone adverse childhood
experiences and the families of such children;
(4) Services to reduce the harm caused by substance use;
(5) Prevention and treatment of infectious diseases in persons
with substance use disorders;
(6) Services for children and other persons in a behavioral
health crisis and the families of such persons;
(7) Housing for persons who have or are in recovery from
substance use disorders;
(8) Campaigns to educate and increase awareness of the
public concerning substance use and substance use disorders;
(9) Programs for persons involved in the criminal justice or
juvenile justice system and the families of such persons, including,
without limitation, programs that are administered by courts;
(10) The evaluation of existing programs relating to
substance use and substance use disorders;
-
*SB337_R1*

– 19 –
(11) Development of the workforce of providers of services
relating to substance use and substance use disorders;
(12) The collection and analysis of data relating to substance
use and substance use disorders;
(13) Capital projects relating to substance use and substance
use disorders, including, without limitation, construction,
purchasing and remodeling; [and]
(14) Implementing the hotline for persons who are
considering suicide or otherwise in a behavioral health crisis and
providing services to persons who access that hotline in accordance
with the provisions of NRS 433.702 to 433.710, inclusive [.] ; and
(15) Research into alternative treatments that do not utilize
an opioid.
(b) Grants to regional, county, local and tribal agencies and
private-sector organizations whose work relates to opioid use
disorder and other substance use disorders.
[3.] 4. The projects described in paragraph (a) of subsection
[2] 3 may include, without limitation, projects to maximize
expenditures through federal, local and private matching
contributions.
[4.] 5. The Department, in consultation with the Office, may
revise the statewide plan to allocate money from the Fund as
necessary without conducting a statewide needs assessment pursuant
to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 of NRS 433.734 so long as a needs
assessment is conducted at the intervals required by that subsection.
Sec. 32. NRS 433.740 is hereby amended to read as follows:
433.740 1. If the Department awards grants pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection [2] 3 of NRS 433.738, the Department,
in consultation with the Office, must:
(a) Develop, solicit and accept applications for those grants. An
application submitted by a regional, local or tribal governmental
entity must include, without limitation:
(1) The results of a needs assessment that meets the
requirements of NRS 433.742; and
(2) A plan for the use of the grant that meets the
requirements of NRS 433.744.
(b) Coordinate with and provide support to regional, local and
tribal governmental entities in conducting needs assessments and
developing plans pursuant to paragraph (a).
(c) Consider any money recovered or anticipated to be recovered
by county, local or tribal governmental agencies through judgments
received or settlements entered into as a result of litigation
concerning the manufacture, distribution, sale or marketing of
opioids.
-
*SB337_R1*

– 20 –
(d) Conduct annual evaluations of programs to which grants
have been awarded.
2. To the extent authorized by the terms of any judgment or
settlement described in subsection 1 of NRS 433.732, the recipient
of a grant pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection [2] 3 of NRS
433.738 may use not more than 8 percent of the grant for
administrative expenses related to the grant or the projects supported
by the grant.
3. The recipient of a grant pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection [2] 3 of NRS 433.738 shall annually submit to the
Department a report concerning the expenditure of the money that
was received and the outcomes of the projects on which that money
was spent.
4. If a regional, local or tribal governmental entity that receives
a grant pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection [2] 3 of NRS
433.738 later recovers money through a judgment or a settlement
resulting from litigation concerning the manufacture, distribution,
sale or marketing of opioids:
(a) The regional, local or tribal governmental entity must
immediately notify the Department; and
(b) The Department may recover from the governmental entity
an amount not to exceed the amount of the grant or the amount of
the recovery, whichever is less.
5. A regional, local or tribal governmental entity that receives a
grant pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection [2] 3 of NRS 433.738
shall conduct a new needs assessment and update its plan for the use
of the grant at intervals prescribed by regulation of the Department,
which must be not less than every 4 years.
Sec. 33. Chapter 630 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A physician or physician assistant who prescribes or
administers opioids shall:
(a) Comply with the requirements of sections 8 to 23, inclusive,
of this act, and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto; and
(b) Offer to a patient an alternative treatment that does not
utilize an opioid before prescribing, administering or directing or
supervising the administration of an opioid to the patient for the
first time unless:
(1) In the opinion of the physician or physician assistant,
there is no treatment that does not utilize an opioid that is suitable
for treating the patient; or
(2) It is not practicable to offer such an alternative
treatment to the patient.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 1 and section
19 of this act, if a patient or his or her legal guardian has executed
-
*SB337_R1*

– 21 –
a non-opioid directive or states that the patient wishes to receive
an alternative treatment that does not utilize an opioid, the
physician or physician assistant shall provide such a treatment.
3. During each even-numbered year, the Board shall review
compliance with the requirements of this section by each
physician and physician assistant who prescribes or administers
opioids to patients.
4. As used in this section, “non-opioid directive” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 9 of this act.
Sec. 34. NRS 630.3066 is hereby amended to read as follows:
630.3066 A physician is not subject to disciplinary action
solely for:
1. Prescribing or administering to a patient under his or her
care a controlled substance which is listed in schedule II, III, IV or
V by the State Board of Pharmacy pursuant to NRS 453.146, if the
controlled substance is lawfully prescribed or administered for the
treatment of intractable pain in accordance with the provisions of
section 33 of this act and NRS 639.23507 and 639.2391 to
639.23916, inclusive, any regulations adopted by the State Board of
Pharmacy pursuant thereto and any other regulations adopted by the
Board of Medical Examiners.
2. Engaging in any activity in accordance with the provisions
of chapter 678C of NRS.
Sec. 35. Chapter 631 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A dentist who prescribes or administers opioids shall:
(a) Comply with the requirements of sections 8 to 23, inclusive,
of this act, and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto; and
(b) Offer to a patient an alternative treatment that does not
utilize an opioid before prescribing, administering or directing or
supervising the administration of an opioid to the patient for the
first time unless:
(1) In the opinion of the dentist, there is no treatment that
does not utilize an opioid that is suitable for treating the patient;
or
(2) It is not practicable to offer such an alternative
treatment to the patient.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 1 and section
19 of this act, if a patient or his or her legal guardian has executed
a non-opioid directive or states that the patient wishes to receive
an alternative treatment that does not utilize an opioid, the dentist
shall provide such a treatment.
3. During each even-numbered year, the Board shall review
compliance with the requirements of this section by each dentist
who prescribes or administers opioids to patients.
-
*SB337_R1*

– 22 –
4. As used in this section, “non-opioid directive” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 9 of this act.
Sec. 36. Chapter 632 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An advanced practice registered nurse or certified
registered nurse anesthetist who prescribes or administers opioids
shall:
(a) Comply with the requirements of sections 8 to 23, inclusive,
of this act, and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto; and
(b) Offer to a patient an alternative treatment that does not
utilize an opioid before prescribing, administering or directing or
supervising the administration of an opioid to the patient for the
first time unless:
(1) In the opinion of the advanced practice registered nurse
or certified registered nurse anesthetist, there is no treatment that
does not utilize an opioid that is suitable for treating the patient;
or
(2) It is not practicable to offer such an alternative
treatment to the patient.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 1 and section
19 of this act, if a patient or his or her legal guardian has executed
a non-opioid directive or states that the patient wishes to receive
an alternative treatment that does not utilize an opioid, the
advanced practice registered nurse or certified registered nurse
anesthetist shall provide such a treatment.
3. During each even-numbered year, the Board shall review
compliance with the requirements of this section by each advanced
practice registered nurse or certified registered nurse anesthetist
who prescribes or administers opioids to patients.
4. As used in this section, “non-opioid directive” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 9 of this act.
Sec. 37. Chapter 633 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An osteopathic physician or physician assistant who
prescribes or administers opioids shall:
(a) Comply with the requirements of sections 8 to 23, inclusive,
of this act, and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto; and
(b) Offer to a patient an alternative treatment that does not
utilize an opioid before prescribing, administering or directing or
supervising the administration of an opioid to the patient for the
first time unless:
(1) In the opinion of the osteopathic physician or physician
assistant, there is no treatment that does not utilize an opioid that
is suitable for treating the patient; or
-
*SB337_R1*

– 23 –
(2) It is not practicable to offer such an alternative
treatment to the patient.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 1 and section
19 of this act, if a patient or his or her legal guardian has executed
a non-opioid directive or states that the patient wishes to receive
an alternative treatment that does not utilize an opioid, the
osteopathic physician or physician assistant shall provide such a
treatment.
3. During each even-numbered year, the Board shall review
compliance with the requirements of this section by each
osteopathic physician or physician assistant who prescribes or
administers opioids to patients.
4. As used in this section, “non-opioid directive” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 9 of this act.
Sec. 38. NRS 633.521 is hereby amended to read as follows:
633.521 An osteopathic physician is not subject to disciplinary
action solely for:
1. Prescribing or administering to a patient under his or her
care:
(a) Amygdalin (laetrile), if the patient has consented to the use
of the substance.
(b) Procaine hydrochloride with preservatives and stabilizers
(Gerovital H3).
(c) A controlled substance which is listed in schedule II, III, IV
or V by the State Board of Pharmacy pursuant to NRS 453.146, if
the controlled substance is lawfully prescribed or administered for
the treatment of intractable pain in accordance with the provisions
of NRS 639.23507 and 639.2391 to 639.23916, inclusive, and
section 37 of this act and any regulations adopted by the State
Board of Pharmacy pursuant thereto and the accepted standards for
the practice of osteopathic medicine.
2. Engaging in any activity in accordance with the provisions
of chapter 678C of NRS.
Sec. 39. Chapter 635 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A podiatric physician who prescribes or administers
opioids shall:
(a) Comply with the requirements of sections 8 to 23, inclusive,
of this act, and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto; and
(b) Offer to a patient an alternative treatment that does not
utilize an opioid before prescribing, administering or directing or
supervising the administration of an opioid to the patient for the
first time unless:
-
*SB337_R1*

– 24 –
(1) In the opinion of the podiatric physician, there is no
treatment that does not utilize an opioid that is suitable for
treating the patient; or
(2) It is not practicable to offer such an alternative
treatment to the patient.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 1 and section
19 of this act, if a patient or his or her legal guardian has executed
a non-opioid directive or states that the patient wishes to receive
an alternative treatment that does not utilize an opioid, the
podiatric physician shall provide such a treatment.
3. During each even-numbered year, the Board shall review
compliance with the requirements of this section by each podiatric
physician who prescribes or administers opioids to patients.
4. As used in this section, “non-opioid directive” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 9 of this act.
Sec. 40. NRS 636.2882 is hereby amended to read as follows:
636.2882 1. An optometrist who is certified to administer and
prescribe a pharmaceutical agent pursuant to NRS 636.288 shall not
prescribe a controlled substance unless the optometrist:
[1.] (a) Has completed an optometric examination of the patient
for whom the controlled substance is prescribed;
[2.] (b) Prescribes the controlled substance in an amount that
does not exceed 90 morphine milligram equivalents per day and will
not last more than 72 hours; and
[3.] (c) Sets forth in the prescription for the controlled
substance that the prescription may not be refilled without a
subsequent examination of the patient by the optometrist.
2. An optometrist who prescribes or administers opioids shall:
(a) Comply with the requirements of sections 8 to 23, inclusive,
of this act, and any regulations adopted pursuant thereto; and
(b) Offer to a patient an alternative treatment that does not
utilize an opioid before prescribing, administering or directing or
supervising the administration of an opioid to the patient for the
first time unless:
(1) In the opinion of the optometrist, there is no treatment
that does not utilize an opioid that is suitable for treating the
patient; or
(2) It is not practicable to offer such an alternative
treatment to the patient.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 and section
19 of this act, if a patient or his or her legal guardian has executed
a non-opioid directive or states that the patient wishes to receive
an alternative treatment that does not utilize an opioid, the
optometrist shall provide such a treatment.
-
*SB337_R1*

– 25 –
4. During each even-numbered year, the Board shall review
compliance with the requirements of this section by each
optometrist who prescribes or administers opioids to patients.
5. As used in this section, “non-opioid directive” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 9 of this act.
Sec. 41. NRS 654.190 is hereby amended to read as follows:
654.190 1. The Board may, after notice and an opportunity
for a hearing as required by law, impose an administrative fine of
not more than $10,000 for each violation on, recover reasonable
investigative fees and costs incurred from, suspend, revoke, deny
the issuance or renewal of or place conditions on the license of, and
place on probation or impose any combination of the foregoing on
any licensee who:
(a) Is convicted of a felony relating to the practice of
administering a facility for skilled nursing or facility for
intermediate care or residential facility for groups or of any offense
involving moral turpitude.
(b) Has obtained his or her license by the use of fraud or deceit.
(c) Violates any of the provisions of this chapter.
(d) Aids or abets any person in the violation of any of the
provisions of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and section 1 of
this act, or 449A.100 to 449A.124, inclusive, and 449A.270 to
449A.286, inclusive, as those provisions pertain to a facility for
skilled nursing, facility for intermediate care or residential facility
for groups.
(e) Violates any regulation of the Board prescribing additional
standards of conduct for licensees, including, without limitation, a
code of ethics.
(f) Engages in conduct that violates the trust of a patient or
resident or exploits the relationship between the licensee and the
patient or resident for the financial or other gain of the licensee.
2. If a licensee requests a hearing pursuant to subsection 1, the
Board shall give the licensee written notice of a hearing pursuant to
NRS 233B.121 and 241.0333. A licensee may waive, in writing, his
or her right to attend the hearing.
3. The Board may compel the attendance of witnesses or the
production of documents or objects by subpoena. The Board may
adopt regulations that set forth a procedure pursuant to which the
Chair of the Board may issue subpoenas on behalf of the Board.
Any person who is subpoenaed pursuant to this subsection may
request the Board to modify the terms of the subpoena or grant
additional time for compliance.
4. An order that imposes discipline and the findings of fact and
conclusions of law supporting that order are public records.
-
*SB337_R1*

– 26 –
5. The expiration of a license by operation of law or by order
or decision of the Board or a court, or the voluntary surrender of a
license, does not deprive the Board of jurisdiction to proceed with
any investigation of, or action or disciplinary proceeding against, the
licensee or to render a decision suspending or revoking the license.
Sec. 42. NRS 687B.225 is hereby amended to read as follows:
687B.225 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
689A.0405, 689A.0412, 689A.0413, 689A.0418, 689A.0437,
689A.044, 689A.0445, 689A.0459, 689B.031, 689B.0312,
689B.0313, 689B.0315, 689B.0317, 689B.0319, 689B.0374,
689B.0378, 689C.1665, 689C.1671, 689C.1675, 689C.1676,
695A.1843, 695A.1856, 695A.1865, 695A.1874, 695B.1912,
695B.1913, 695B.1914, 695B.1919, 695B.19197, 695B.1924,
695B.1925, 695B.1942, 695C.1696, 695C.1699, 695C.1713,
695C.1735, 695C.1737, 695C.1743, 695C.1745, 695C.1751,
695G.170, 695G.1705, 695G.171, 695G.1714, 695G.1715,
695G.1719 and 695G.177, and sections 43, 45, 46, 48, 49, 50 and
53 of this act, any contract for group, blanket or individual health
insurance or any contract by a nonprofit hospital, medical or dental
service corporation or organization for dental care which provides
for payment of a certain part of medical or dental care may require
the insured or member to obtain prior authorization for that care
from the insurer or organization. The insurer or organization shall:
(a) File its procedure for obtaining approval of care pursuant to
this section for approval by the Commissioner; and
(b) Unless a shorter time period is prescribed by a specific
statute, including, without limitation, NRS 689A.0446, 689B.0361,
689C.1688, 695A.1859, 695B.19087, 695C.16932 and 695G.1703,
respond to any request for approval by the insured or member
pursuant to this section within 20 days after it receives the request.
2. The procedure for prior authorization may not discriminate
among persons licensed to provide the covered care.
Sec. 43. Chapter 689A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of health
insurance shall:
(a) Comply with subsection 2 of section 16 of this act; and
(b) Include in the policy coverage for at least one alternative to
an opioid that is effective for each purpose for which:
(1) An opioid is commonly used; and
(2) A non-opioid alternative is available.
2. An insurer shall not:
(a) Require prior authorization for the benefits described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 if such prior authorization would
not be required for an opioid under the same circumstances; or
-
*SB337_R1*

– 27 –
(b) Impose other requirements on the benefits described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 that would not be imposed on an
opioid used under the same circumstances.
3. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by this section, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section, “non-opioid directive” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 9 of this act.
Sec. 44. NRS 689A.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.330 If any policy is issued by a domestic insurer for
delivery to a person residing in another state, and if the insurance
commissioner or corresponding public officer of that other state has
informed the Commissioner that the policy is not subject to approval
or disapproval by that officer, the Commissioner may by ruling
require that the policy meet the standards set forth in NRS 689A.030
to 689A.320, inclusive [.] , and section 43 of this act.
Sec. 45. Chapter 689B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of group health
insurance shall:
(a) Comply with subsection 2 of section 16 of this act; and
(b) Include in the policy coverage for at least one alternative to
an opioid that is effective for each purpose for which:
(1) An opioid is commonly used; and
(2) A non-opioid alternative is available.
2. An insurer shall not:
(a) Require prior authorization for the benefits described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 if such prior authorization would
not be required for an opioid under the same circumstances; or
(b) Impose other requirements on the benefits described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 that would not be imposed on an
opioid used under the same circumstances.
3. A policy of group health insurance subject to the
provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by this section, and any provision
of the policy that conflicts with the provisions of this section is
void.
4. As used in this section, “non-opioid directive” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 9 of this act.
Sec. 46. Chapter 689C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit plan shall:
-
*SB337_R1*

– 28 –
(a) Comply with subsection 2 of section 16 of this act; and
(b) Include in the plan coverage for at least one alternative to
an opioid that is effective for each purpose for which:
(1) An opioid is commonly used; and
(2) A non-opioid alternative is available.
2. A carrier shall not:
(a) Require prior authorization for the benefits described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 if such prior authorization would
not be required for an opioid under the same circumstances; or
(b) Impose other requirements on the benefits described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 that would not be imposed on an
opioid used under the same circumstances.
3. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the plan that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section, “non-opioid directive” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 9 of this act.
Sec. 47. NRS 689C.425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689C.425 A voluntary purchasing group and any contract
issued to such a group pursuant to NRS 689C.360 to 689C.600,
inclusive, are subject to the provisions of NRS 689C.015 to
689C.355, inclusive, and section 46 of this act to the extent
applicable and not in conflict with the express provisions of NRS
687B.408 and 689C.360 to 689C.600, inclusive.
Sec. 48. Chapter 695A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A society that offers or issues a benefit contract shall:
(a) Comply with subsection 2 of section 16 of this act; and
(b) Include in the contract coverage for at least one alternative
to an opioid that is effective for each purpose for which:
(1) An opioid is commonly used; and
(2) A non-opioid alternative is available.
2. A society shall not:
(a) Require prior authorization for the benefits described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 if such prior authorization would
not be required for an opioid under the same circumstances; or
(b) Impose other requirements on the benefits described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 that would not be imposed on an
opioid used under the same circumstances.
3. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
-
*SB337_R1*

– 29 –
required by this section, and any provision of the contract that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section, “non-opioid directive” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 9 of this act.
Sec. 49. Chapter 695B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A hospital or medical services corporation that offers or
issues a policy of health insurance shall:
(a) Comply with subsection 2 of section 16 of this act; and
(b) Include in the policy coverage for at least one alternative to
an opioid that is effective for each purpose for which:
(1) An opioid is commonly used; and
(2) A non-opioid alternative is available.
2. A hospital or medical services corporation shall not:
(a) Require prior authorization for the benefits described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 if such prior authorization would
not be required for an opioid under the same circumstances; or
(b) Impose other requirements on the benefits described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 that would not be imposed on an
opioid used under the same circumstances.
3. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by this section, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section, “non-opioid directive” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 9 of this act.
Sec. 50. Chapter 695C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A health maintenance organization that offers or issues a
health care plan shall:
(a) Comply with subsection 2 of section 16 of this act; and
(b) Include in the plan coverage for at least one alternative to
an opioid that is effective for each purpose for which:
(1) An opioid is commonly used; and
(2) A non-opioid alternative is available.
2. A health maintenance organization shall not:
(a) Require prior authorization for the benefits described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 if such prior authorization would
not be required for an opioid under the same circumstances; or
(b) Impose other requirements on the benefits described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 that would not be imposed on an
opioid used under the same circumstances.
3. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
-
*SB337_R1*

– 30 –
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the plan that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section, “non-opioid directive” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 9 of this act.
Sec. 51. NRS 695C.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.050 1. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or
in specific provisions of this title, the provisions of this title are not
applicable to any health maintenance organization granted a
certificate of authority under this chapter. This provision does not
apply to an insurer licensed and regulated pursuant to this title
except with respect to its activities as a health maintenance
organization authorized and regulated pursuant to this chapter.
2. Solicitation of enrollees by a health maintenance
organization granted a certificate of authority, or its representatives,
must not be construed to violate any provision of law relating to
solicitation or advertising by practitioners of a healing art.
3. Any health maintenance organization authorized under this
chapter shall not be deemed to be practicing medicine and is exempt
from the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS.
4. The provisions of NRS 695C.110, 695C.125, 695C.1691,
695C.1693, 695C.170, 695C.1703, 695C.1705, 695C.1709 to
695C.173, inclusive, 695C.1733, 695C.17335, 695C.1734,
695C.1751, 695C.1755, 695C.1759, 695C.176 to 695C.200,
inclusive, and 695C.265 and section 50 of this act do not apply to a
health maintenance organization that provides health care services
through managed care to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan
for Medicaid or insurance pursuant to the Children’s Health
Insurance Program pursuant to a contract with the Division of
Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health and
Human Services. This subsection does not exempt a health
maintenance organization from any provision of this chapter for
services provided pursuant to any other contract.
5. The provisions of NRS 695C.16932 to 695C.1699,
inclusive, 695C.1701, 695C.1708, 695C.1728, 695C.1731,
695C.17333, 695C.17345, 695C.17347, 695C.1736 to 695C.1745,
inclusive, 695C.1757 and 695C.204 apply to a health maintenance
organization that provides health care services through managed
care to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid.
6. The provisions of NRS 695C.17095 do not apply to a health
maintenance organization that provides health care services to
members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program. This
subsection does not exempt a health maintenance organization from
any provision of this chapter for services provided pursuant to any
other contract.
-
*SB337_R1*

– 31 –
7. The provisions of NRS 695C.1735 do not apply to a health
maintenance organization that provides health care services to:
(a) The officers and employees, and the dependents of officers
and employees, of the governing body of any county, school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of this State; or
(b) Members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program.
 This subsection does not exempt a health maintenance
organization from any provision of this chapter for services
provided pursuant to any other contract.
Sec. 52. NRS 695C.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.330 1. The Commissioner may suspend or revoke any
certificate of authority issued to a health maintenance organization
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter if the Commissioner finds
that any of the following conditions exist:
(a) The health maintenance organization is operating
significantly in contravention of its basic organizational document,
its health care plan or in a manner contrary to that described in and
reasonably inferred from any other information submitted pursuant
to NRS 695C.060, 695C.070 and 695C.140, unless any amendments
to those submissions have been filed with and approved by the
Commissioner;
(b) The health maintenance organization issues evidence of
coverage or uses a schedule of charges for health care services
which do not comply with the requirements of NRS 695C.1691 to
695C.200, inclusive, and section 50 of this act, 695C.204 or
695C.207;
(c) The health care plan does not furnish comprehensive health
care services as provided for in NRS 695C.060;
(d) The Commissioner certifies that the health maintenance
organization:
(1) Does not meet the requirements of subsection 1 of NRS
695C.080; or
(2) Is unable to fulfill its obligations to furnish health care
services as required under its health care plan;
(e) The health maintenance organization is no longer financially
responsible and may reasonably be expected to be unable to meet its
obligations to enrollees or prospective enrollees;
(f) The health maintenance organization has failed to put into
effect a mechanism affording the enrollees an opportunity to
participate in matters relating to the content of programs pursuant to
NRS 695C.110;
(g) The health maintenance organization has failed to put into
effect the system required by NRS 695C.260 for:
-
*SB337_R1*

– 32 –
(1) Resolving complaints in a manner reasonably to dispose
of valid complaints; and
(2) Conducting external reviews of adverse determinations
that comply with the provisions of NRS 695G.241 to 695G.310,
inclusive;
(h) The health maintenance organization or any person on its
behalf has advertised or merchandised its services in an untrue,
misrepresentative, misleading, deceptive or unfair manner;
(i) The continued operation of the health maintenance
organization would be hazardous to its enrollees or creditors or to
the general public;
(j) The health maintenance organization fails to provide the
coverage required by NRS 695C.1691; or
(k) The health maintenance organization has otherwise failed to
comply substantially with the provisions of this chapter.
2. A certificate of authority must be suspended or revoked only
after compliance with the requirements of NRS 695C.340.
3. If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance
organization is suspended, the health maintenance organization shall
not, during the period of that suspension, enroll any additional
groups or new individual contracts, unless those groups or persons
were contracted for before the date of suspension.
4. If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance
organization is revoked, the organization shall proceed, immediately
following the effective date of the order of revocation, to wind up its
affairs and shall conduct no further business except as may be
essential to the orderly conclusion of the affairs of the organization.
It shall engage in no further advertising or solicitation of any kind.
The Commissioner may, by written order, permit such further
operation of the organization as the Commissioner may find to be in
the best interest of enrollees to the end that enrollees are afforded
the greatest practical opportunity to obtain continuing coverage for
health care.
Sec. 53. Chapter 695G of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A managed care organization that offers or issues a health
care plan shall:
(a) Comply with subsection 2 of section 16 of this act; and
(b) Include in the plan coverage for at least one alternative to
an opioid that is effective for each purpose for which:
(1) An opioid is commonly used; and
(2) A non-opioid alternative is available.
2. A managed care organization shall not:
-
*SB337_R1*

– 33 –
(a) Require prior authorization for the benefits described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 if such prior authorization would
not be required for an opioid under the same circumstances; or
(b) Impose other requirements on the benefits described in
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 that would not be imposed on an
opioid used under the same circumstances.
3. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by this section, and any provision of the plan that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section, “non-opioid directive” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 9 of this act.
Sec. 53.5. NRS 695G.090 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.090 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
the provisions of this chapter apply to each organization and insurer
that operates as a managed care organization and may include,
without limitation, an insurer that issues a policy of health
insurance, an insurer that issues a policy of individual or group
health insurance, a carrier serving small employers, a fraternal
benefit society, a hospital or medical service corporation and a
health maintenance organization.
2. In addition to the provisions of this chapter, each managed
care organization shall comply with:
(a) The provisions of chapter 686A of NRS, including all
obligations and remedies set forth therein; and
(b) Any other applicable provision of this title.
3. The provisions of NRS 695G.127, 695G.1639, 695G.164,
695G.1645, 695G.167 and section 53 of this act and 695G.200 to
695G.230, inclusive, do not apply to a managed care organization
that provides health care services to recipients of Medicaid under
the State Plan for Medicaid or insurance pursuant to the Children’s
Health Insurance Program pursuant to a contract with the Division
of Health Care Financing and Policy of the Department of Health
and Human Services.
4. The provisions of NRS 695C.1735 and 695G.1639 do not
apply to a managed care organization that provides health care
services to members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program.
5. Subsections 3 and 4 do not exempt a managed care
organization from any provision of this chapter for services
provided pursuant to any other contract.
-
*SB337_R1*

– 34 –
Sec. 54. Chapter 695K of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If the Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services finds that a health
care facility has violated section 1 of this act or a practitioner
licensing board finds that a practitioner has violated section 33,
35, 36, 37 or 39 of this act or NRS 636.2882, the Director may:
(a) Reduce the reimbursement rates received by the health
care facility or practitioner, as applicable, from the Public Option;
or
(b) Prohibit the health care facility or practitioner, as
applicable, from receiving payments through the insurance
provided through the Public Option.
2. The Director of the Department of Health and Human
Services shall include in any contract with a health care facility or
practitioner notice of the actions the Director may take pursuant
to subsection 1.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Health care facility” means a medical facility, as defined
in NRS 449.0151, or a facility which is required by the regulations
adopted by the State Board of Health pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to
be licensed.
(b) “Practitioner” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 639.0125.
(c) “Practitioner licensing board” means a board created
pursuant to chapter 630, 631, 632, 633, 635 or 636 of NRS.
Sec. 55. 1. The Department of Health and Human Services
may continue to utilize the statewide plan created pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 433.734 that is in effect on
January 1, 2026. The Department shall comply with the provisions
of NRS 433.738, as amended by section 31 of this act, when
revising the statewide plan.
2. Notwithstanding the amendatory provisions of sections 1,
16, 33, 35, 36, 37 and 39 of this act and NRS 636.2882, as amended
by section 40 of this act:
(a) A medical facility or facility which is required by the
regulations adopted by the State Board of Health pursuant to NRS
449.0303 to be licensed that administers opioids to patients is not
required to offer treatments that are alternatives to opioids to
patients or require practitioners who provide care at the facility to
take any action described in paragraph (b) until July 1, 2027, or 6
months after the date on which the regulations adopted pursuant to
section 21 of this act become effective, whichever occurs later;
(b) A practitioner who prescribes or administers opioids is not
required to explain to the patient or his or her legal guardian that the
-
*SB337_R1*

– 35 –
patient or legal guardian, as applicable, may execute a non-opioid
directive, provide the non-opioid directive to a patient or his or her
legal guardian or offer treatments that are alternatives to opioids
until July 1, 2027, or 6 months after the date on which the
regulations adopted pursuant to section 21 of this act become
effective, whichever occurs later;
(c) The Division of Public and Behavioral Health of the
Department of Health and Human Services may not review the
compliance of medical facilities and facilities which are required by
the regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be licensed
with the requirements of section 1 of this act until January 1, 2029,
or 18 months after the date on which the regulations adopted
pursuant to section 21 of this act become effective, whichever
occurs later; and
(d) A practitioner licensing board may not review the
compliance of practitioners with the requirements of sections 33, 35,
36, 37 and 39 of this act and NRS 636.2882, as amended by section
40 of this act, until January 1, 2029, or 18 months after the date on
which the regulations adopted pursuant to section 21 of this act
become effective, whichever occurs later.
3. A practitioner who discovers on or before the date set forth
in paragraph (b) of subsection 1 that a patient is a non-opioid patient
and is unable to offer a treatment that is an alternative to an opioid
to the patient shall, where the practitioner would otherwise be
required by section 33, 35, 36, 37 or 39 of this act or NRS 636.2882,
as amended by section 40 of this act, to offer such an alternative
treatment, refer the patient to a provider of health care who is able to
offer such a treatment.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 449.0151.
(b) “Non-opioid directive” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 9 of this act.
(c) “Non-opioid patient” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 10 of this act.
(d) “Practitioner” has the meaning ascribed to it in section 11 of
this act.
(e) “Practitioner licensing board” has the meaning ascribed to it
in section 12 of this act.
Sec. 56. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 57. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 56, inclusive, of this act become effective:
-
*SB337_R1*

– 36 –
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB337_R1*